Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.560

Election review section.

An election review section is established in the elections division of the office of the secretary of state. Permanent staff of the elections division, trained and certified as required by RCW 29A.04.540, shall perform the election review functions prescribed by RCW 29A.04.570. The staff may also be required to assist in training, certification, and other duties as may be assigned by the secretary of state to ensure the uniform and orderly conduct of elections in this state.

[ 2003 c 111 s 154. Prior: 1992 c 163 s 8. Formerly RCW 29.60.060.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 163 ss 5-13: See note following RCW 29A.04.530.